Washington statutes.
RCW 23B.08.440

Contract rights of officers.

(1) The appointment of an officer does not itself create contract rights.

(2) An officer's removal does not affect the officer's contract rights, if any, with the corporation. An officer's resignation does not affect the corporation's contract rights, if any, with the officer.

[ 1989 c 165 s 104.]